Utah statutes.
58-31b-305.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1)  The division shall issue each license or certification under this chapter in accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule.  The division may by rule extend or shorten a renewal period by as much as one year to stagger the renewal cycles it administers.

(2)  At the time of renewal, the licensee or person certified under this chapter shall show satisfactory evidence of each of the following renewal requirements:

(a)  complete and submit an application for renewal in a form prescribed by the division and pay the renewal fee determined under Section 63J-1-504; and

(b)  meet continuing competency requirements as established by rule, which shall include continuing education requirements for medication aide certified established by the board and adopted by the division by rule.

(3)  In addition to the renewal requirements under Subsection (2), a person licensed as a advanced practice registered nurse shall be currently certified by a program approved by the division in collaboration with the board and submit evidence satisfactory to the division of that qualification or if licensed prior to July 1, 1992, meet the requirements established by rule.

(4)  Each license or certification automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the license or certification unless renewed in accordance with Section 58-1-308.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

